Illinois, session 104th, SB787.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Nuclear Safety Preparedness Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (420 ILCS 5/1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4301)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Nuclear Safety Preparedness Act".9(Source: P.A. 81-577.)